Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB638.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1631(1) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a subclause to read:Section 1631. Place of Filing.--Any statement or report required by this article to be filed, shall be done in the following manner:(1) * * *(iii) A statement or report which is required by this article to be filed with a county and which contains information 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 regarding contributions shall, upon receipt by the county, be forwarded to the Secretary of the Commonwealth so that the information can be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Department of State.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0638PN0645 - 2 - 123456